Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB848.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 451(b)(1) and (2) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended and the subsection is amended by adding 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 paragraphs to read:Section 451. State Planning Board.--* * *(b) (1) The State Planning Board shall consist of [fifteen members to be appointed by the Governor from among the citizens of the State, who during their terms shall hold no other office in the executive branch of State Government to which any salary is attached. In addition to these members, there shall be six ex officio members, the Secretary of Agriculture, the Secretary of Community and Economic Development, the Secretary of Environmental Protection, the Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Secretary of Public Welfare and the Secretary of Transportation. There shall also be two] the following:(i) Two members appointed by, and who serve at the pleasure of, the President pro tempore of the Senate, neither of whom shall be members of the same political party[, and two].(ii) Two members appointed by, and who serve at the pleasure of, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, neither of whom shall be members of the same political party.(iii) F ifteen members appointed by the Governor from among the residents of this Commonwealth, who during their terms shall hold no other office in the executive branch of State Government to which a salary is attached.(iv) The following ex officio members:(A) The Secretary of Agriculture.(B) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development.(C) The Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources.(D) The Secretary of Environmental Protection.(E) The Secretary of Human Services.(F) The Secretary of Transportation.20250SB0848PN0940 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) The Director of Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.(H) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.(1.1) The terms of office of those members appointed by the Governor under paragraph (1)(iii) shall be for four years and until their successors are appointed and have qualified. In case of a vacancy, the Governor shall make an appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.(1.2) The Governor shall designate the chairman and vice-chairman of the board from among the members of the board, other than the ex officio and legislative members.(2) [Thirteen] Fourteen members of the board shall constitute a quorum.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0848PN0940 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516